Indiana, session 2026, HB1112.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-10-8-7.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.2. (a) As used in this section, "breast cancer
diagnostic service" means a procedure intended to aid in the diagnosis
of breast cancer. The term includes procedures performed on an
inpatient basis and procedures performed on an outpatient basis,
including the following:
(1) Breast cancer screening mammography.
(2) Surgical breast biopsy.
(3) Pathologic examination and interpretation.
(b) As used in this section, "breast cancer outpatient treatment
services" means procedures that are intended to treat cancer of the
human breast and that are delivered on an outpatient basis. The term
includes the following:
(1) Chemotherapy.
(2) Hormonal therapy.
(3) Radiation therapy.
2026 IN 1112—LS 6125/DI 154


(4) Surgery.
(5) Other outpatient cancer treatment services prescribed by a
physician.
(6) Medical follow-up services related to the procedures set forth
in subdivisions (1) through (5).
(c) As used in this section, "breast cancer rehabilitative services"
means procedures that are intended to improve the results of or to
ameliorate the debilitating consequences of the treatment of breast
cancer and that are delivered on an inpatient or outpatient basis. The
term includes the following:
(1) Physical therapy.
(2) Psychological and social support services.
(3) Reconstructive plastic surgery, including chest wall
reconstruction and aesthetic flat closure (as defined by the
National Cancer Institute).
(d) As used in this section, "breast cancer screening mammography"
means a standard, two (2) view per breast, low-dose radiographic
examination of the breasts that is:
(1) furnished to an asymptomatic woman; and
(2) performed by a mammography services provider using
equipment designed by the manufacturer for and dedicated
specifically to mammography in order to detect unsuspected
breast cancer.
The term includes the interpretation of the results of a breast cancer
screening mammography by a physician.
(e) As used in this section, "cost sharing requirements" means:
(1) a deductible;
(2) coinsurance;
(3) a copayment; and
(4) any maximum limitation on the application of a
deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or similar out-of-pocket
expense.
(e) (f) As used in this section, "covered individual" means a female
individual who is:
(1) covered under a self-insurance program established under
section 7(b) of this chapter to provide group health coverage; or
(2) entitled to services under a contract with a health maintenance
organization (as defined in IC 27-13-1-19) that is entered into or
renewed under section 7(c) of this chapter.
(f) (g) As used in this section, "mammography services provider"
means an individual or facility that:
(1) has been accredited by the American College of Radiology;
2026 IN 1112—LS 6125/DI 154


(2) meets equivalent guidelines established by the Indiana
department of health; or
(3) is certified by the federal Department of Health and Human
Services for participation in the Medicare program (42 U.S.C.
1395 et seq.).
(h) As used in this section, "supplemental breast examination"
means a medically necessary and appropriate examination of the
breast, including an examination using breast cancer screening
mammography, breast magnetic resonance imaging, or ultrasound
services, that is:
(1) used to screen for breast cancer when there is no
abnormality seen or detected; and
(2) based on:
(A) personal or family medical history; or
(B) additional factors;
that may increase the covered individual's risk of breast
cancer.
(g) (i) As used in this section, "woman at risk" means a woman who
meets at least one (1) of the following descriptions:
(1) A woman who has a personal history of breast cancer.
(2) A woman who has a personal history of breast disease that
was proven benign by biopsy.
(3) A woman whose mother, sister, or daughter has had breast
cancer.
(4) A woman who is at least thirty (30) years of age and has not
given birth.
(h) (j) A self-insurance program established under section 7(b) of
this chapter to provide health care coverage must provide covered
individuals with coverage for breast cancer diagnostic services, breast
cancer outpatient treatment services, and breast cancer rehabilitative
services. The coverage must provide reimbursement for breast cancer
screening mammography at a level at least as high as:
(1) the limitation on payment for screening mammography
services established in 42 CFR 405.534(b)(3) according to the
Medicare Economic Index at the time the breast cancer screening
mammography is performed; or
(2) the rate negotiated by a contract provider according to the
provisions of the insurance policy;
whichever is lower. Except as provided in subsection (o), the costs of
the coverage required by this subsection may be paid by the state or by
the employee or by a combination of the state and the employee.
(i) (k) A contract with a health maintenance organization that is
2026 IN 1112—LS 6125/DI 154


entered into or renewed under section 7(c) of this chapter must provide
covered individuals with breast cancer diagnostic services, breast
cancer outpatient treatment services, and breast cancer rehabilitative
services.
(j) (l) The coverage required by subsection (h) (j) and services
required by subsection (i) (k) may not be subject to dollar limits,
deductibles, or coinsurance provisions that are less favorable to
covered individuals than the dollar limits, deductibles, or coinsurance
provisions applying to physical illness generally under the
self-insurance program or contract with a health maintenance
organization.
(k) (m) The coverage for breast cancer diagnostic services required
by subsection (h) (j) and the breast cancer diagnostic services required
by subsection (i) (k) must include the following:
(1) In the case of a covered individual who is at least thirty-five
(35) years of age but less than forty (40) years of age, at least one
(1) baseline breast cancer screening mammography performed
upon the individual before she becomes forty (40) years of age.
(2) In the case of a covered individual who is:
(A) less than forty (40) years of age; and
(B) a woman at risk;
at least one (1) breast cancer screening mammography performed
upon the covered individual every year.
(3) In the case of a covered individual who is at least forty (40)
years of age, at least one (1) breast cancer screening
mammography performed upon the individual every year.
(4) Any additional mammography views that are required for
proper evaluation.
(5) Ultrasound services, if determined medically necessary by the
physician treating the covered individual.
(6) Supplemental breast examination.
(l) (n) The coverage for breast cancer diagnostic services required
by subsection (h) (j) and the breast cancer diagnostic services required
by subsection (i) (k) shall be provided in addition to any benefits
specifically provided for x-rays, laboratory testing, or wellness
examinations.
(o) The coverage for breast cancer diagnostic services required
by subsection (j) and the breast cancer diagnostic services required
by subsection (k) may not be subject to any cost sharing
requirements.
SECTION 2. IC 27-8-14-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
2026 IN 1112—LS 6125/DI 154


1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. As used in this chapter, "cost sharing
requirements" means:
(1) a deductible;
(2) coinsurance;
(3) a copayment; and
(4) any maximum limitation on the application of a
deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or similar out-of-pocket
expense.
SECTION 3. IC 27-8-14-2.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.7. As used in this chapter, "diagnostic breast
examination" means a medically necessary and appropriate
examination of the breast, including an examination using
diagnostic mammography, breast magnetic resonance imaging, or
ultrasound services, that is:
(1) used to evaluate an abnormality seen or suspected from a
screening examination for breast cancer; or
(2) used to evaluate an abnormality detected by another
means of examination.
SECTION 4. IC 27-8-14-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. As used in this chapter, "supplemental breast
examination" means a medically necessary and appropriate
examination of the breast, including an examination using
diagnostic mammography, breast magnetic resonance imaging, or
ultrasound services, that is:
(1) used to screen for breast cancer when there is no
abnormality seen or detected; and
(2) based on:
(A) personal or family medical history; or
(B) additional factors;
that may increase the insured's risk of breast cancer.
SECTION 5. IC 27-8-14-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (f), (g), an insurer must provide coverage for
breast cancer screening mammography and diagnostic breast
examination in any accident and sickness insurance policy that the
insurer issues in Indiana.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (f), (g), the coverage that an
insurer must provide under this section must include the following:
(1) If the insured is at least thirty-five (35) but less than forty (40)
years of age, coverage for at least one (1) baseline breast cancer
2026 IN 1112—LS 6125/DI 154


screening mammography performed upon the insured before she
becomes forty (40) years of age.
(2) If the insured is:
(A) less than forty (40) years of age; and
(B) a woman at risk;
one (1) breast cancer screening mammography performed upon
the insured every year.
(3) If the insured is at least forty (40) years of age, one (1) breast
cancer screening mammography performed upon the insured
every year.
(4) Any additional mammography views that are required for
proper evaluation.
(5) Ultrasound services, if determined medically necessary by the
physician treating the insured.
(6) Supplemental breast examination.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (f), (g), the coverage that an
insurer must provide under this section must provide reimbursement
for breast cancer screening mammography at a level at least as high as:
(1) the limitation on payment for screening mammography
services established in 42 CFR 405.534(b)(3) according to the
Medicare Economic Index at the time the breast cancer screening
mammography is performed; or
(2) the rate negotiated by a contract provider according to the
provisions of the insurance policy;
whichever is lower.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (f), (g), the coverage that an
insurer must provide under this section may not be subject to dollar
limits, deductibles, or coinsurance provisions that are less favorable to
the insured than the dollar limits, deductibles, or coinsurance
provisions applying to physical illness generally under the accident and
sickness insurance policy.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f), (g), the coverage that an
insurer must provide is in addition to any benefits specifically provided
for x-rays, laboratory testing, or wellness examinations.
(f) Except as provided in subsection (g), the coverage that an
insurer must provide under this section may not be subject to any
cost sharing requirements.
(f) (g) In the case of insurance policies that are not employer based,
the insurer must offer to provide the coverage described in subsections
(a) through (e). (f).
SECTION 6. IC 27-13-7-15.3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.3. (a) As used in this
2026 IN 1112—LS 6125/DI 154


section, "breast cancer screening mammography" has the meaning set
forth in IC 27-8-14-2.
(b) As used in this section, "cost sharing requirements" has the
meaning set forth in IC 27-8-14-2.5.
(c) As used in this section, "diagnostic breast examination" has
the meaning set forth in IC 27-8-14-2.7.
(d) As used in this section, "supplemental breast examination"
has the meaning set forth in IC 27-8-14-4.5.
(b) (e) As used in this section, "woman at risk" has the meaning set
forth in IC 27-8-14-5.
(c) (f) Except as provided in subsection (g), (k), a health
maintenance organization issued a certificate of authority in Indiana
shall provide breast cancer screening mammography and diagnostic
breast examination as a covered service services under every group
contract that provides coverage for basic health care services.
(d) (g) Except as provided in subsection (g), (k), the coverage that
a health maintenance organization must provide under this section must
include the following:
(1) If the enrollee is at least thirty-five (35) years of age but less
than forty (40) years of age and a female, coverage for at least one
(1) baseline breast cancer screening mammography performed
upon the enrollee before the enrollee becomes forty (40) years of
age.
(2) If the enrollee is less than forty (40) years of age and a woman
at risk, one (1) breast cancer screening mammography performed
upon the enrollee every year.
(3) If the enrollee is at least forty (40) years of age and a female,
one (1) breast cancer screening mammography performed upon
the enrollee every year.
(4) Any additional mammography views that are required for
proper evaluation.
(5) Ultrasound services, if determined medically necessary by the
physician treating the enrollee.
(6) Supplemental breast examination.
(e) (h) Except as provided in subsection (g), (k), the coverage that
a health maintenance organization must provide under this section may
not be subject to a contract provision that is less favorable to an
enrollee or a subscriber than contract provisions applying to physical
illness generally under the health maintenance organization contract.
(f) (i) Except as provided in subsection (g), (k), the coverage that a
health maintenance organization must provide under this section is in
addition to services specifically provided for x-rays, laboratory testing,
2026 IN 1112—LS 6125/DI 154


or wellness examinations.
(j) Except as provided in subsection (k), the coverage that a
health maintenance organization must provide under this section
may not be subject to any cost sharing requirements.
(g) (k) In the case of coverage that is not employer based, the health
maintenance organization must offer to provide the coverage described
in subsections (c) (f) through (f). (j).
2026 IN 1112—LS 6125/DI 154